Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.802

Reduction of retirement allowance upon reemployment or if covered by a plan under RCW 28B.10.400—Reestablishment of membership.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1936.SL) ***

(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.

(2)(a) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section, may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, or as a firefighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or in a position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, without suspension of his or her benefit.

(b)(i) Between March 23, 2022, and July 1, 2025, a retiree who reenters employment more than one month after his or her accrual date, and who enters service in a school district in a nonadministrative position shall continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such service, until the retiree has rendered service for more than 1,040 hours in a calendar year.

(ii) Between March 23, 2022, and July 1, 2025, a retiree that retired before January 1, 2022, and who enters service in a second-class school district, as defined in RCW 28A.300.065, as either a district superintendent or an in-school administrator shall continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such service, until the retiree has rendered service for more than 1,040 hours in a calendar year.

(iii) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this subsection (2)(b) in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to be employed for more than 867 hours in a calendar year without a reduction of his or her pension.

(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW 41.32.044, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and immediately becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire if eligible.

[ 2023 c 410 s 3; 2022 c 110 s 2; 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 12; 2004 c 242 s 61; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 8; 1997 c 254 s 8.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2023 c 410: See notes following RCW 41.32.765.

Effective date—2022 c 110: See note following RCW 41.32.570.

Intent—Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 47: See notes following RCW 28B.10.400.

Effective date—2004 c 242: See RCW 41.37.901.

Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 10: See note following RCW 41.40.037.

Intent—Construction—Application—1997 c 254: See notes following RCW 41.26.490.